Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.210

Medical director.

The director shall designate a medical director. If required, other physicians may be employed to report on special cases. The medical director shall arrange for and pass upon all medical examinations required under the provisions of chapter 41.32 RCW, investigate all essential statements and certificates by or on behalf of a member in connection with an application for a disability allowance, and report in writing to the board of trustees the conclusions and recommendations upon all matters under referral.

[ 1992 c 72 s 10; 1991 c 35 s 34; 1947 c 80 s 13; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4995-32. Prior: 1941 c 97 s 2, part; 1937 c 221 s 3, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 4995-3, part. Formerly RCW 41.32.130.]

NOTES:

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.